Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 3. Municipal Executive and Administrator.

Cross references. —

For requirement that the charter of a unified municipality include provisions relating to the subjects covered by AS

29.20.220

—

29.20.280

, see AS

29.06.320

(1)(E).

Sec. 29.20.220.
Executive power.

The executive power in a municipality is vested in a mayor. The mayor of a home rule or unified municipality is elected by the voters. The mayors of other municipalities are elected in accordance with AS

29.20.230

.

The mayor acts as ceremonial head of government, executes official documents on authorization of the governing body, and is responsible for additional duties and powers prescribed by this chapter or by home rule charter.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.20.230.
Election and term of mayor.

The mayor of a borough or first class city is elected at large. The mayor of a borough or first class city serves a term of three years, unless by ordinance a different term not to exceed four years is provided. The current term of an incumbent mayor may not be altered. The regular term of a mayor of a borough or first class city begins on the first Monday following certification of the election.

The mayor of a second class city is elected by and from the council, and serves until a successor is elected and qualifies. The council of a second class city shall meet on the first Monday after certification of the regular election and elect a mayor who takes office immediately. The mayor of a second class city serves a one-year term, unless a longer term is provided by ordinance. The mayor of a second class city may serve only while a member of the council regardless of the term established for the office of mayor.

Except by ordinance ratified by the voters, no limit may be placed on the total number of terms or number of consecutive terms a mayor may serve.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, a second class city may by ordinance provide that the mayor is elected, from the council, by the voters rather than by the council. If an ordinance is adopted under this subsection, the council shall meet on the first Monday after certification of each regular election and elect a council member to serve as mayor pro tempore who takes office immediately and exercises the powers and duties of mayor until the permanent mayor takes office. Within 45 days after certification of a regular election, a special election shall be held for the permanent mayor. The permanent mayor takes office on the first Monday following certification of the special election and serves until the first Monday after certification of the next regular election. The term of a mayor in office on the effective date of an ordinance adopted under this subsection may not be altered.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 79 SLA 1996)

Sec. 29.20.240.
Qualifications for the office of mayor.

A voter of the municipality is eligible to hold the office of mayor in a borough or first class city. A member of the city council is eligible to hold the office of mayor in a second class city.

Residency requirements for the office of mayor not exceeding three years may be prescribed by ordinance.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.20.250.
Powers and duties of mayor.

If a municipality has not adopted a manager plan of government, the mayor is the chief administrator and the mayor has the same powers and duties as those of a manager under AS

29.20.500

.

The mayor may take part in the discussion of a matter before the governing body. The mayor may not vote, except that the mayor of a first class city or the mayor of a borough with a manager form of government may vote in the case of a tie. The mayor of a second class city, as a council member, may vote on all matters.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.20.260.
Executive absence.

The borough mayor, subject to assembly approval, shall designate a person to act as mayor during the borough mayor’s temporary absence or disability. If a manager plan has been adopted, the assembly shall designate by resolution a borough administrative official to act as manager during the manager’s absence or disability.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.20.270.
Veto.

Except as provided in (c) — (e) of this section, the mayor may veto an ordinance, resolution, motion, or other action of the governing body and may strike or reduce appropriation items.

A veto must be exercised before the next regular meeting of the governing body and must be accompanied by a written explanation of the reasons for the veto. A veto may be overridden by vote of two-thirds of the authorized membership of the governing body within 21 days following exercise of the veto, or at the next regular meeting, whichever is later.

The veto does not extend to

appropriation items in a school budget ordinance;

actions of the governing body sitting as the board of equalization or the board of adjustment;

adoption or repeal of a manager plan of government.

The mayor of a second class city has no veto power.

The veto does not extend to an ordinance adopted under AS

04.11.501

. This subsection applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 13, 14 ch 80 SLA 1986; am § 63 ch 101 SLA 1995)

Collateral references. —

56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 311 — 314.

62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 268 — 271.

Sec. 29.20.280.
Vacancy in the office of mayor.

The governing body shall, by two-thirds concurring vote, declare the office of mayor vacant only when the person elected

fails to qualify or take office within 30 days after election or appointment;

unless excused by the governing body, is physically absent for 90 consecutive days;

resigns and the resignation is accepted;

is physically or mentally unable to perform the duties of office;

is convicted of a felony or of an offense involving a violation of the oath of office;

is convicted of a felony or misdemeanor described in AS 15.56;

is convicted of a violation of AS 15.13;

no longer physically resides in the municipality; or

if a member of the governing body in a second class city, misses three consecutive regular meetings and is not excused.

A vacancy in the office of mayor occurring six months before a regular election shall be filled by the governing body. The person appointed serves until the next regular election when a successor is elected to serve the balance of the term. If a member of the governing body is appointed mayor, the member shall resign the seat on the governing body. If a vacancy occurs more than six months before a regular election, the governing body shall call a special election to fill the unexpired term.

Notwithstanding (b) of this section, a vacancy in the office of mayor of a second class city shall be filled by and from the council. A mayor appointed under this subsection serves the balance of the term to which appointed, except the mayor may serve only while a member of the council.

History.

(§ 7 ch 74 SLA 1985)